Utah statutes.
78A-6-116.   Minor's cases considered civil proceedings -- Adjudication of
jurisdiction by juvenile court not conviction of crime -- Exceptions -- Minor
not to be charged with crime -- Exception -- Traffic violation cases --
Abstracts to Department of Public Safety.
(1)  Except as provided in Sections 78A-6-701, 78A-6-702, and 78A-6-703,
proceedings in a minor's case shall be regarded as civil proceedings with the
court exercising equitable powers.
(2)  An adjudication by a juvenile court that a minor is within its
jurisdiction under Section 78A-6-103 is not considered a conviction of a
crime, except in cases involving traffic violations.  An adjudication may not
operate to impose any civil disabilities upon the minor nor to disqualify the
minor for any civil service or military service or appointment.
(3)  A minor may not be charged with a crime or convicted in any court except
as provided in Sections  78A-6-701, 78A-6-702, and 78A-6-703, and in cases
involving traffic violations.  When a petition has been filed in the juvenile
court, the minor may not later be subjected to criminal prosecution based on
the same facts except as provided in Section 78A-6-702 or 78A-6-703.
(4)  An adjudication by a juvenile court that a minor is within its
jurisdiction under Section 78A-6-103 is considered a conviction for the
purposes of determining the level of offense for which a minor may be charged
and enhancing the level of an offense in the juvenile court.  A prior
adjudication may be used to enhance the level or degree of an offense
committed by an adult only as otherwise specifically provided.
(5)  Abstracts of court records for all adjudications of traffic violations
shall be submitted to the Department of Public Safety as provided in Section
53-3-218.
(6)  Information necessary to collect unpaid fines, fees, assessments, bail,
or restitution may be forwarded to employers, financial institutions, law
enforcement, constables, the Office of Recovery Services, or other agencies
for purposes of enforcing the order as provided in Section 78A-6-117.
